Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.643, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Animal premises data. (a) deleted text begin Except for farmed Cervidae premises location data collected and maintained under section 35.155,deleted text end The following data collected and maintained by the Board of Animal Health related to registration and identification of premises and animals under chapter 35deleted text begin , aredeleted text end new text begin isnew text end classified as private or nonpublic: (1) the names and addresses; (2) the location of the premises where animals are kept; and (3) the identification number of the premises or the animal. (b) Except as provided in section 347.58, subdivision 5, data collected and maintained by the Board of Animal Health under sections 347.57 to 347.64 deleted text begin aredeleted text end new text begin isnew text end classified as private or nonpublic. (c) The Board of Animal Health may disclose data collected under paragraph (a) or (b) to any person, agency, or to the public if the board determines that the access will aid in the law enforcement process or the protection of public or animal health or safety. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end